Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-160] Additional powers. The
powers conferred upon the corporation by this subpart shall be in addition and
supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing in this
subpart shall be construed as limiting any powers, rights, privileges, or
immunities so conferred. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next